Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 6
UNSOLICITED GOODS

Section

6-6-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Unsolicited goods" means contractual obligations or other tangible or intangible property or services delivered to a person who has not ordered, solicited, or agreed to purchase them, but shall not include tangible or intangible goods or services which are misdirected, misdelivered, or offered in good faith in substitution for goods solicited by the recipient.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 262, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1574, § 6, effective July 1.

6-6-102. Obligation of recipient.

Unless otherwise agreed, where unsolicited goods are delivered to a person, he has a right to refuse to accept delivery of the goods and is not bound to return such goods to the sender.

If such unsolicited goods are either addressed to or intended for the recipient, they shall be deemed a gift to the recipient, who may use them or dispose of them in any manner he sees fit without any obligation to the sender.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 262, § 1, effective July 14.

6-6-103. Collections prohibited - penalty - definition.

No sender of any unsolicited goods shall mail or otherwise send to any recipient of such unsolicited goods a bill for such unsolicited goods or any dunning communications.

The sender of a magazine or other periodical shall cancel a subscription if any invoice is returned by the recipient marked "cancel". Cancellation shall also occur when the recipient gives written notice of cancellation to the sender at the sender's address or at the address of the subscription department printed in the periodical, or, if no such department is listed, at the general business address of the periodical.

Notice of cancellation may be given by regular mail, and is effective on the date received by the sender. Notice of cancellation need not take any particular form and is sufficient if it indicates by any form of written expression that the recipient wishes to terminate the subscription. Within sixty days after notice of cancellation for prepaid subscriptions, the sender shall refund to the recipient any amount paid for the subscription less the amount owed by the recipient for any periodicals, together with the postage thereon, if postage has been charged separately, received before the effective date of the notice of cancellation.

For purposes of this subsection (2), "sender" means the publisher of a periodical, any person acting as the agent of such publisher, and any person purporting to act as the agent of such publisher, and a seller of the periodical.

Violation of this section constitutes a petty offense. Violation of this section also constitutes a deceptive trade practice in violation of the "Colorado Consumer Protection Act", article 1 of this title 6, and is subject to remedies or penalties, or both, pursuant thereto.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 262, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 297, § 11, effective May 20.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1574, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 387, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3135, § 61, effective March 1, 2022.